Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Compensation from Benefits of Crime

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

21A Am. Jur. 2d Criminal Law §§ 1321 to 1330.

24 C.J.S. Criminal Law § 1759 et seq.

§ 1-40-301.
Compensation from benefits of crime.

The legislature finds
that the state has a compelling interest in preventing any person
who is convicted of a criminal act from profiting from the criminal
act and in recompensing victims of the criminal act. It is therefore
the intent of the legislature to provide a mechanism whereby any profits
from a criminal act that are received by the person convicted of the
criminal act are available as restitution to the victims of the criminal
act.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1.

§ 1-40-302.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 81, § 3.

“Criminal act” means a conviction of an offense as defined by W.S. 1-40-202(a)(i);

“Escrow account” means an account created under W.S. 1-40-303(a);

“Profits from the crime” means:

Any property obtained through or income generated from the commission of the criminal act of which the defendant was convicted;

Any property obtained by or income generated from the sale, conversion or exchange of proceeds of the criminal act of which the defendant was convicted, including any gain realized by the sale, conversion or exchange; and

Any property that the defendant obtained or income generated as a result of having committed the criminal act of which the defendant was convicted, including any assets obtained through the use of unique knowledge obtained during the commission of, or in preparation for the commission of, the criminal act, as well as any property obtained by or income generated from the sale, conversion or exchange of such property and any gain realized by such sale, conversion or exchange.

“Victim” means as defined by W.S. 1-40-202(a)(ii);

“Division” means the victim services division within the office of the attorney general, created by W.S.

9-1-636

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, §§ 2, 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-40-303.
Distribution of profits from crime.

Any person who contracts with a defendant convicted of a criminal act in this state, or the defendant’s representative or assignee, for payment of any profits from the criminal act of which the defendant is convicted shall pay to the division any money that would otherwise by terms of the contract be paid to the defendant or the defendant’s representatives or assignees. The division shall deposit the money in an escrow account for the benefit of any victim of the criminal act of which the defendant was convicted.

Notwithstanding any other applicable statute of limitations, any person who is a victim of the criminal act from which a defendant receives profits under subsection (a) of this section may, within five (5) years of the establishment of the escrow account:

Enforce any order of restitution entered against the defendant against the monies on deposit in the escrow account; or

Bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover a judgment against the defendant or the defendant’s representatives or designees and enforce the judgment against monies on deposit in the escrow account.

Upon establishing an escrow account pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the division shall notify, at their last known address, all known victims of the criminal act of the establishment of the escrow account. The notice shall specify the existence of the escrow account, the amount on deposit and the victim’s right to execute an order of restitution or bring a civil action to recover against the monies in the escrow account within five (5) years of the date the escrow account is established.

The attorney general is authorized to bring any action necessary to enforce subsection (a) of this section. If the attorney general prevails in an action under this subsection, the court shall order the payment from the monies recovered to the attorney general of reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

§ 1-40-304.
Notification of division.

It shall be the responsibility
of the victim, the victim’s attorney, or the victim’s representative
to notify the division of the filing of any civil action under W.S. 1-40-303(b)(ii).

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

§ 1-40-305.
Disbursal of compensation; more than one claim.

The division shall not disburse any compensation from the escrow account until the later of:

Five (5) years after the escrow account is established; or

The date all civil actions of which the division has actual knowledge and that are filed within the five (5) year period provided by W.S. 1-40-303(b)(ii) have been settled or reduced to judgment.

If more than one (1) claim against the monies in escrow is filed pursuant to W.S. 1-40-303(b)(i) or (ii), the division shall disburse payments from the escrow account on a pro rata basis.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

§ 1-40-306.
Actions null and void.

Any action taken by a
defendant who is convicted of a criminal act or who enters a plea
of guilty, whether by way of the execution of a power of attorney,
the creation of corporate entities or any other action, to defeat
the purpose of this article shall be null and void as against the
public policy of this state.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1.

§ 1-40-307.
Interest on monies in escrow account.

Interest earned on the
monies deposited in an escrow account shall accrue to the benefit
of the payees of the account.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1.

§ 1-40-308.
Disbursal of unclaimed funds.

Any unclaimed funds remaining in an escrow account after the disbursal period provided by W.S. 1-40-305(a) shall be forfeited and paid over to the crime victims compensation account created by W.S.

1-40-114

in accordance with this section.

If any unclaimed funds remain in an escrow account after the disbursal period provided by W.S. 1-40-305(a), the division shall seek an order in district court to show cause why the funds should not be forfeited. Notice to the defendant and proceedings on the order to show cause shall be according to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, provided notice by publication shall be once each week for two (2) consecutive weeks. The trial of the issues shall be by the court.

On final hearing the order to show cause shall be taken as prima facie evidence that the funds constitute profits from the crime and is sufficient for a judgment of forfeiture in the absence of other proof.

In disputed cases the burden shall be upon the division to show that there is a reasonable basis for believing that the funds constitute profits from the crime.

The proceedings and judgment of forfeiture shall be in rem and shall be primarily against the property itself.

Upon the entry of a judgment of forfeiture the court shall order the funds paid over to the crime victims compensation account created by W.S.

1-40-114

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 152, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.